Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.043

Board may establish foundation.

A commodity board may establish a foundation using commission funds as grant money when the foundation benefits the commodity for which the board was established. Commission funds may be used for the purposes authorized in the marketing order.

[ 2001 c 315 s 7.]